Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.061

Credit for service in Seattle's police relief and pension fund system—Terms and conditions.

(1) A member who fulfills the requirements of RCW 41.40.059 may file a written declaration no later than September 30, 1992, with the department and the Seattle police relief and pension fund system indicating the member's desire to make an irrevocable transfer of credit from the Seattle system to this retirement system. The member shall restore his or her contributions, with interest since the date of withdrawal as determined by the director, no later than December 31, 1992.

(2) Upon receipt of the written declaration, the Seattle police relief and pension fund system shall send the department a report of the member's service credit. It shall also transfer to the department the portion of such member's contributions that was retained in the Seattle police relief and pension fund pursuant to RCW 41.20.150, plus a sum equal to such member's total contributions to the Seattle police relief and pension fund, which shall be treated as matching contributions by the employer, plus the compound interest that would have been generated by such sums, as determined by the Seattle city treasurer. The Seattle police relief and pension fund system shall send the service credit report and transfer the funds within ninety days of receiving the member's written declaration.

[ 1992 c 157 s 4.]